Illinois, session 104th, SB1560.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 52-3.203 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.203)7    Sec. 2-3.203. Mental health screenings. 8    (a) On or before December 15, 2023, the State Board of 9Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 10Health Transformation Officer, Children's Behavioral Health 11Transformation Team in , and the Office of the Governor, shall 12file a report with the Governor and the General Assembly that 13includes recommendations for implementation of mental health 14screenings in schools for students enrolled in kindergarten 15through grade 12. This report must include a landscape scan of 16current district-wide screenings, recommendations for 17screening tools, training for staff, and linkage and referral 18for identified students.19    (b) On or before October 1, 2024, the State Board of 20Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 21Health Transformation Team in , the Office of the Governor, 22and relevant stakeholders as needed shall release a strategy 23that includes a tool for measuring capacity and readiness to   SB1560 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1implement universal mental health screening of students. The 2strategy shall build upon existing efforts to understand 3district needs for resources, technology, training, and 4infrastructure supports. The strategy shall include a 5framework for supporting districts in a phased approach to 6implement universal mental health screenings. The State Board 7of Education shall issue a report to the Governor and the 8General Assembly on school district readiness and plan for 9phased approach to universal mental health screening of 10students on or before April 1, 2025. 11    (c) On or before September 1, 2026, the State Board of 12Education, in consultation with the Children's Behavioral 13Health Transformation Team in the Office of the Governor and 14relevant stakeholders, shall report its work and make 15available resource materials, including model procedures and 16guidance informed by a phased approach to implementing 17universal mental health screening in schools. These model 18school district procedures to facilitate the implementation of 19mental health screenings shall include, but are not limited 20to, the option to opt-out, confidentiality and privacy 21considerations, communication with families and communities 22about the use of mental health screenings, data sharing, and 23storage of mental health screening results and plans for 24follow-up and linkage to resources after screenings. Guidance 25shall include (1) mental health screening tools available for 26school districts to use with students and (2) associated   SB1560 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1training for school personnel. The State Board of Education 2shall make these resource materials available on its website. 3    (d) Mental health screenings shall be offered by school 4districts to students enrolled in grade 3 through grade 12, at 5least once a year, beginning with the 2027-2028 school year. A 6district may, by action of the State Board of Education, apply 7for an extension of the 2027-2028 school year implementation 8deadline if the school district meets criteria set by rule by 9the State Board of Education, which shall be based on the 10recommendations of the report issued in accordance with 11subsection (c). Notwithstanding the provisions of this 12subsection, the requirement to offer mental health screenings 13shall be in effect only for school years in which the State has 14successfully procured a screening tool that offers a 15self-report option for students and is made available to 16school districts at no cost. 17(Source: P.A. 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 18103-885, eff. 8-9-24.) 19    Section 10. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 20changing Section 5-5.23 as follows: 21    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.23)22    Sec. 5-5.23. Children's mental health services. 23    (a) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, by 24rule, shall require the screening and assessment of a child   SB1560 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1prior to any Medicaid-funded admission to an inpatient 2hospital for psychiatric services to be funded by Medicaid. 3The screening and assessment shall include a determination of 4the appropriateness and availability of out-patient support 5services for necessary treatment. The Department, by rule, 6shall establish methods and standards of payment for the 7screening, assessment, and necessary alternative support 8services.9    (b) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, to 10the extent allowable under federal law, shall secure federal 11financial participation for Individual Care Grant expenditures 12made by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services for 13the Medicaid optional service authorized under Section 1905(h) 14of the federal Social Security Act, pursuant to the provisions 15of Section 7.1 of the Mental Health and Developmental 16Disabilities Administrative Act. The Department of Healthcare 17and Family Services may exercise the authority under this 18Section as is necessary to administer Individual Care Grants 19as authorized under Section 7.1 of the Mental Health and 20Developmental Disabilities Administrative Act. 21    (c) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 22work collaboratively with the Department of Children and 23Family Services and the Division of Mental Health of the 24Department of Human Services to implement subsections (a) and 25(b).26    (d) On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce   SB1560 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1any rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or 2alter any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any 3rate of reimbursement for services or other payments in 4accordance with Section 5-5e. 5    (e) All rights, powers, duties, and responsibilities 6currently exercised by the Department of Human Services 7related to the Individual Care Grant program are transferred 8to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services with the 9transfer and transition of the Individual Care Grant program 10to the Department of Healthcare and Family Services to be 11completed and implemented within 6 months after the effective 12date of this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly. For 13the purposes of the Successor Agency Act, the Department of 14Healthcare and Family Services is declared to be the successor 15agency of the Department of Human Services, but only with 16respect to the functions of the Department of Human Services 17that are transferred to the Department of Healthcare and 18Family Services under this amendatory Act of the 99th General 19Assembly.20        (1) Each act done by the Department of Healthcare and 21    Family Services in exercise of the transferred powers, 22    duties, rights, and responsibilities shall have the same 23    legal effect as if done by the Department of Human 24    Services or its offices.25        (2) Any rules of the Department of Human Services that 26    relate to the functions and programs transferred by this   SB1560 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1    amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly that are in 2    full force on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 3    the 99th General Assembly shall become the rules of the 4    Department of Healthcare and Family Services. All rules 5    transferred under this amendatory Act of the 99th General 6    Assembly are hereby amended such that the term 7    "Department" shall be defined as the Department of 8    Healthcare and Family Services and all references to the 9    "Secretary" shall be changed to the "Director of 10    Healthcare and Family Services or his or her designee". As 11    soon as practicable hereafter, the Department of 12    Healthcare and Family Services shall revise and clarify 13    the rules to reflect the transfer of rights, powers, 14    duties, and responsibilities affected by this amendatory 15    Act of the 99th General Assembly, using the procedures for 16    recodification of rules available under the Illinois 17    Administrative Procedure Act, except that existing title, 18    part, and section numbering for the affected rules may be 19    retained. The Department of Healthcare and Family 20    Services, consistent with its authority to do so as 21    granted by this amendatory Act of the 99th General 22    Assembly, shall propose and adopt any other rules under 23    the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to 24    administer the Individual Care Grant program. These rules 25    may include, but are not limited to, the application 26    process and eligibility requirements for recipients.  SB1560 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1        (3) All unexpended appropriations and balances and 2    other funds available for use in connection with any 3    functions of the Individual Care Grant program shall be 4    transferred for the use of the Department of Healthcare 5    and Family Services to operate the Individual Care Grant 6    program. Unexpended balances shall be expended only for 7    the purpose for which the appropriation was originally 8    made. The Department of Healthcare and Family Services 9    shall exercise all rights, powers, duties, and 10    responsibilities for operation of the Individual Care 11    Grant program.12        (4) Existing personnel and positions of the Department 13    of Human Services pertaining to the administration of the 14    Individual Care Grant program shall be transferred to the 15    Department of Healthcare and Family Services with the 16    transfer and transition of the Individual Care Grant 17    program to the Department of Healthcare and Family 18    Services. The status and rights of Department of Human 19    Services employees engaged in the performance of the 20    functions of the Individual Care Grant program shall not 21    be affected by this amendatory Act of the 99th General 22    Assembly. The rights of the employees, the State of 23    Illinois, and its agencies under the Personnel Code and 24    applicable collective bargaining agreements or under any 25    pension, retirement, or annuity plan shall not be affected 26    by this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly. All   SB1560 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1    transferred employees who are members of collective 2    bargaining units shall retain their seniority, continuous 3    service, salary, and accrued benefits.4        (5) All books, records, papers, documents, property 5    (real and personal), contracts, and pending business 6    pertaining to the powers, duties, rights, and 7    responsibilities related to the functions of the 8    Individual Care Grant program, including, but not limited 9    to, material in electronic or magnetic format and 10    necessary computer hardware and software, shall be 11    delivered to the Department of Healthcare and Family 12    Services; provided, however, that the delivery of this 13    information shall not violate any applicable 14    confidentiality constraints.15        (6) Whenever reports or notices are now required to be 16    made or given or papers or documents furnished or served 17    by any person to or upon the Department of Human Services 18    in connection with any of the functions transferred by 19    this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly, the same 20    shall be made, given, furnished, or served in the same 21    manner to or upon the Department of Healthcare and Family 22    Services.23        (7) This amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly 24    shall not affect any act done, ratified, or canceled or 25    any right occurring or established or any action or 26    proceeding had or commenced in an administrative, civil,   SB1560 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1    or criminal cause regarding the Department of Human 2    Services before the effective date of this amendatory Act 3    of the 99th General Assembly; and those actions or 4    proceedings may be defended, prosecuted, and continued by 5    the Department of Human Services.6    (f) (Blank). 7    (g) Family Support Program. The Department of Healthcare 8and Family Services shall restructure the Family Support 9Program, formerly known as the Individual Care Grant program, 10to enable early treatment of youth, emerging adults, and 11transition-age adults with a serious mental illness or serious 12emotional disturbance.13        (1) As used in this subsection and in subsections (h) 14    through (s):15            (A) "Youth" means a person under the age of 18. 16            (B) "Emerging adult" means a person who is 18 17        through 20 years of age. 18            (C) "Transition-age adult" means a person who is 19        21 through 25 years of age. 20        (2) The Department shall amend 89 Ill. Adm. Code 139 21    in accordance with this Section and consistent with the 22    timelines outlined in this Section.23        (3) Implementation of any amended requirements shall 24    be completed within 8 months of the adoption of any 25    amendment to 89 Ill. Adm. Code 139 that is consistent with 26    the provisions of this Section.   SB1560 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1        (4) To align the Family Support Program with the 2    Medicaid system of care, the services available to a 3    youth, emerging adult, or transition-age adult through the 4    Family Support Program shall include all Medicaid 5    community-based mental health treatment services and all 6    Family Support Program services included under 89 Ill. 7    Adm. Code 139. No person receiving services through the 8    Family Support Program or the Specialized Family Support 9    Program shall become a Medicaid enrollee unless Medicaid 10    eligibility criteria are met and the person is enrolled in 11    Medicaid. No part of this Section creates an entitlement 12    to services through the Family Support Program, the 13    Specialized Family Support Program, or the Medicaid 14    program. 15        (5) The Family Support Program shall align with the 16    following system of care principles: 17            (A) Treatment and support services shall be based 18        on the results of an integrated behavioral health 19        assessment and treatment plan using an instrument 20        approved by the Department of Healthcare and Family 21        Services.22            (B) Strong interagency collaboration between all 23        State agencies the parent or legal guardian is 24        involved with for services, including the Department 25        of Healthcare and Family Services, the Department of 26        Human Services, the Department of Children and Family   SB1560 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1        Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the 2        Illinois State Board of Education.3            (C) Individualized, strengths-based practices and 4        trauma-informed treatment approaches.5            (D) For a youth, full participation of the parent 6        or legal guardian at all levels of treatment through a 7        process that is family-centered and youth-focused. The 8        process shall include consideration of the services 9        and supports the parent, legal guardian, or caregiver 10        requires for family stabilization, and shall connect 11        such person or persons to services based on available 12        insurance coverage. 13    (h) Eligibility for the Family Support Program. 14Eligibility criteria established under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 139 15for the Family Support Program shall include the following: 16        (1) Individuals applying to the program must be under 17    the age of 26. 18        (2) Requirements for parental or legal guardian 19    involvement are applicable to youth and to emerging adults 20    or transition-age adults who have a guardian appointed 21    under Article XIa of the Probate Act.22        (3) Youth, emerging adults, and transition-age adults 23    are eligible for services under the Family Support Program 24    upon their third inpatient admission to a hospital or 25    similar treatment facility for the primary purpose of 26    psychiatric treatment within the most recent 12 months and   SB1560 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1    are hospitalized for the purpose of psychiatric treatment.2        (4) School participation for emerging adults applying 3    for services under the Family Support Program may be 4    waived by request of the individual at the sole discretion 5    of the Department of Healthcare and Family Services.6        (5) School participation is not applicable to 7    transition-age adults. 8    (i) Notification of Family Support Program and Specialized 9Family Support Program services. 10        (1) Within 12 months after the effective date of this 11    amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, the 12    Department of Healthcare and Family Services, with 13    meaningful stakeholder input through a working group of 14    psychiatric hospitals, Family Support Program providers, 15    family support organizations, the Community and 16    Residential Services Authority, a statewide association 17    representing a majority of hospitals, a statewide 18    association representing physicians, and foster care 19    alumni advocates, shall establish a clear process by which 20    a youth's or emerging adult's parents, guardian, or 21    caregiver, or the emerging adult or transition-age adult, 22    is identified, notified, and educated about the Family 23    Support Program and the Specialized Family Support Program 24    upon a first psychiatric inpatient hospital admission, and 25    any following psychiatric inpatient admissions. 26    Notification and education may take place through a Family   SB1560 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1    Support Program coordinator, a mobile crisis response 2    provider, a Comprehensive Community Based Youth Services 3    provider, the Community and Residential Services 4    Authority, or any other designated provider or coordinator 5    identified by the Department of Healthcare and Family 6    Services. In developing this process, the Department of 7    Healthcare and Family Services and the working group shall 8    take into account the unique needs of emerging adults and 9    transition-age adults without parental involvement who are 10    eligible for services under the Family Support Program. 11    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services and the 12    working group shall ensure the appropriate provider or 13    coordinator is required to assist individuals and their 14    parents, guardians, or caregivers, as applicable, in the 15    completion of the application or referral process for the 16    Family Support Program or the Specialized Family Support 17    Program. 18        (2) (Blank) Upon a youth's, emerging adult's or 19    transition-age adult's second psychiatric inpatient 20    hospital admission, prior to hospital discharge, the 21    hospital must, if it is aware of the patient's prior 22    psychiatric inpatient hospital admission, ensure that the 23    youth's parents, guardian, or caregiver, or the emerging 24    adult or transition-age adult, has been notified of the 25    Family Support Program and the Specialized Family Support 26    Program.   SB1560 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1        (3) Psychiatric lockout as last resort. 2            (A) Prior to referring any youth to the Department 3        of Children and Family Services for the filing of a 4        petition in accordance with subparagraph (c) of 5        paragraph (1) of Section 2-4 of the Juvenile Court Act 6        of 1987 alleging that the youth is dependent because 7        the youth was left in a psychiatric hospital beyond 8        medical necessity, the hospital shall attempt to 9        contact the youth and the youth's parents, guardian, 10        or caregiver about the BEACON portal Family Support 11        Program and the Specialized Family Support Program and 12        shall assist with entering the youth's information 13        into the BEACON portal to begin the process of 14        connecting the youth and family to available resources 15        connections to the designated Family Support Program 16        coordinator in the service area by providing 17        educational materials developed by the Department of 18        Healthcare and Family Services. Once this process has 19        begun, any such youth shall be considered a youth for 20        whom an application for the Family Support Program is 21        pending with the Department of Healthcare and Family 22        Services or an active application for the Family 23        Support Program was being reviewed by the Department 24        for the purposes of subsection (a) of Section 2-4b of 25        the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or for the purposes of 26        subsection (a) of Section 5-711 of the Juvenile Court   SB1560 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1        Act of 1987. 2            (B) No state agency or hospital shall coach a 3        parent or guardian of a youth in a psychiatric 4        hospital inpatient unit to lock out or otherwise 5        relinquish custody of a youth to the Department of 6        Children and Family Services for the sole purpose of 7        obtaining necessary mental health treatment for the 8        youth. In the absence of abuse or neglect, a 9        psychiatric lockout or custody relinquishment to the 10        Department of Children and Family Services shall only 11        be considered as the option of last resort. Nothing in 12        this Section shall prohibit discussion of medical 13        treatment options or a referral to legal counsel. 14        (4) Development of new Family Support Program 15    services. 16            (A) Development of specialized therapeutic 17        residential treatment for youth and emerging adults 18        with high-acuity mental health conditions. Through a 19        working group led by the Department of Healthcare and 20        Family Services that includes the Department of 21        Children and Family Services and residential treatment 22        providers for youth and emerging adults, the 23        Department of Healthcare and Family Services, within 24        12 months after the effective date of this amendatory 25        Act of the 101st General Assembly, shall develop a 26        plan for the development of specialized therapeutic   SB1560 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1        residential treatment beds similar to a qualified 2        residential treatment program, as defined in the 3        federal Family First Prevention Services Act, for 4        youth in the Family Support Program with high-acuity 5        mental health needs. The Department of Healthcare and 6        Family Services and the Department of Children and 7        Family Services shall work together to maximize 8        federal funding through Medicaid and Title IV-E of the 9        Social Security Act in the development and 10        implementation of this plan.11            (B) Using the Department of Children and Family 12        Services' beyond medical necessity data over the last 13        5 years and any other relevant, available data, the 14        Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 15        assess the estimated number of these specialized 16        high-acuity residential treatment beds that are needed 17        in each region of the State based on the number of 18        youth remaining in psychiatric hospitals beyond 19        medical necessity and the number of youth placed 20        out-of-state who need this level of care. The 21        Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 22        report the results of this assessment to the General 23        Assembly by no later than December 31, 2020. 24            (C) Development of an age-appropriate therapeutic 25        residential treatment model for emerging adults and 26        transition-age adults. Within 30 months after the   SB1560 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1        effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 2        General Assembly, the Department of Healthcare and 3        Family Services, in partnership with the Department of 4        Human Services' Division of Mental Health and with 5        significant and meaningful stakeholder input through a 6        working group of providers and other stakeholders, 7        shall develop a supportive housing model for emerging 8        adults and transition-age adults receiving services 9        through the Family Support Program who need 10        residential treatment and support to enable recovery. 11        Such a model shall be age-appropriate and shall allow 12        the residential component of the model to be in a 13        community-based setting combined with intensive 14        community-based mental health services. 15    (j) Workgroup to develop a plan for improving access to 16substance use treatment. The Department of Healthcare and 17Family Services and the Department of Human Services' Division 18of Substance Use Prevention and Recovery shall co-lead a 19working group that includes Family Support Program providers, 20family support organizations, and other stakeholders over a 2112-month period beginning in the first quarter of calendar 22year 2020 to develop a plan for increasing access to substance 23use treatment services for youth, emerging adults, and 24transition-age adults who are eligible for Family Support 25Program services. 26    (k) Appropriation. Implementation of this Section shall be   SB1560 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1limited by the State's annual appropriation to the Family 2Support Program. Spending within the Family Support Program 3appropriation shall be further limited for the new Family 4Support Program services to be developed accordingly:5        (1) Targeted use of specialized therapeutic 6    residential treatment for youth and emerging adults with 7    high-acuity mental health conditions through appropriation 8    limitation. No more than 12% of all annual Family Support 9    Program funds shall be spent on this level of care in any 10    given state fiscal year. 11        (2) Targeted use of residential treatment model 12    established for emerging adults and transition-age adults 13    through appropriation limitation. No more than one-quarter 14    of all annual Family Support Program funds shall be spent 15    on this level of care in any given state fiscal year. 16    (l) Exhausting third party insurance coverage first. 17        (A) A parent, legal guardian, emerging adult, or 18    transition-age adult with private insurance coverage shall 19    work with the Department of Healthcare and Family 20    Services, or its designee, to identify insurance coverage 21    for any and all benefits covered by their plan. If 22    insurance cost-sharing by any method for treatment is 23    cost-prohibitive for the parent, legal guardian, emerging 24    adult, or transition-age adult, Family Support Program 25    funds may be applied as a payer of last resort toward 26    insurance cost-sharing for purposes of using private   SB1560 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1    insurance coverage to the fullest extent for the 2    recommended treatment. If the Department, or its agent, 3    has a concern relating to the parent's, legal guardian's, 4    emerging adult's, or transition-age adult's insurer's 5    compliance with Illinois or federal insurance requirements 6    relating to the coverage of mental health or substance use 7    disorders, it shall refer all relevant information to the 8    applicable regulatory authority. 9        (B) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services 10    shall use Medicaid funds first for an individual who has 11    Medicaid coverage if the treatment or service recommended 12    using an integrated behavioral health assessment and 13    treatment plan (using the instrument approved by the 14    Department of Healthcare and Family Services) is covered 15    by Medicaid. 16        (C) If private or public insurance coverage does not 17    cover the needed treatment or service, Family Support 18    Program funds shall be used to cover the services offered 19    through the Family Support Program. 20    (m) Service authorization. A youth, emerging adult, or 21transition-age adult enrolled in the Family Support Program or 22the Specialized Family Support Program shall be eligible to 23receive a mental health treatment service covered by the 24applicable program if the medical necessity criteria 25established by the Department of Healthcare and Family 26Services are met.   SB1560 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1    (n) Streamlined application. The Department of Healthcare 2and Family Services shall revise the Family Support Program 3applications and the application process to reflect the 4changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 5101st General Assembly within 8 months after the adoption of 6any amendments to 89 Ill. Adm. Code 139. 7    (o) Study of reimbursement policies during planned and 8unplanned absences of youth and emerging adults in Family 9Support Program residential treatment settings. The Department 10of Healthcare and Family Services shall undertake a study of 11those standards of the Department of Children and Family 12Services and other states for reimbursement of residential 13treatment during planned and unplanned absences to determine 14if reimbursing residential providers for such unplanned 15absences positively impacts the availability of residential 16treatment for youth and emerging adults. The Department of 17Healthcare and Family Services shall begin the study on July 181, 2019 and shall report its findings and the results of the 19study to the General Assembly, along with any recommendations 20for or against adopting a similar policy, by December 31, 212020. 22    (p) Public awareness and educational campaign for all 23relevant providers. The Department of Healthcare and Family 24Services shall engage in a public awareness campaign to 25educate hospitals with psychiatric units, crisis response 26providers such as Screening, Assessment and Support Services   SB1560 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1providers and Comprehensive Community Based Youth Services 2agencies, schools, and other community institutions and 3providers across Illinois on the changes made by this 4amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly to the Family 5Support Program. The Department of Healthcare and Family 6Services shall produce written materials geared for the 7appropriate target audience, develop webinars, and conduct 8outreach visits over a 12-month period beginning after 9implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 10amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. 11    (q) Maximizing federal matching funds for the Family 12Support Program and the Specialized Family Support Program. 13The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, as the sole 14Medicaid State agency, shall seek approval from the federal 15Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services within 12 months 16after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 17General Assembly to draw additional federal Medicaid matching 18funds for individuals served under the Family Support Program 19or the Specialized Family Support Program who are not covered 20by the Department's medical assistance programs. The 21Department of Children and Family Services, as the State 22agency responsible for administering federal funds pursuant to 23Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, shall submit a State 24Plan to the federal government within 12 months after the 25effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 26Assembly to maximize the use of federal Title IV-E prevention   SB1560 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1funds through the federal Family First Prevention Services 2Act, to provide mental health and substance use disorder 3treatment services and supports, including, but not limited 4to, the provision of short-term crisis and transition beds 5post-hospitalization for youth who are at imminent risk of 6entering Illinois' youth welfare system solely due to the 7inability to access mental health or substance use treatment 8services. 9    (r) Outcomes and data reported annually to the General 10Assembly. Beginning in 2021, the Department of Healthcare and 11Family Services shall submit an annual report to the General 12Assembly that includes the following information with respect 13to the time period covered by the report:14        (1) The number and ages of youth, emerging adults, and 15    transition-age adults who requested services under the 16    Family Support Program and the Specialized Family Support 17    Program and the services received. 18        (2) The number and ages of youth, emerging adults, and 19    transition-age adults who requested services under the 20    Specialized Family Support Program who were eligible for 21    services based on the number of hospitalizations. 22        (3) The number and ages of youth, emerging adults, and 23    transition-age adults who applied for Family Support 24    Program or Specialized Family Support Program services but 25    did not receive any services. 26    (s) Rulemaking authority. Unless a timeline is otherwise   SB1560 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 11224 KTG 21306 b1specified in a subsection, if amendments to 89 Ill. Adm. Code 2139 are needed for implementation of this Section, such 3amendments shall be filed by the Department of Healthcare and 4Family Services within one year after the effective date of 5this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly.6(Source: P.A. 101-461, eff. 1-1-20; 101-616, eff. 12-20-19.) 7    Section 15. The Interagency Children's Behavioral Health 8Services Act is amended by adding Section 35 as follows: 9    (405 ILCS 165/35 new)10    Sec. 35. BEACON training. The Department of Human 11Services, in coordination with a statewide association 12representing a majority of hospitals, shall establish and 13offer a voluntary training that will be recorded and made 14available on the Department's website to all hospital social 15workers, clinicians, and administrative staff to inform them 16of BEACON, a centralized resource for Illinois youth and 17families seeking services for behavioral health needs, with 18the goal of encouraging families to seek assistance through 19BEACON and the Interagency Children's Behavioral Health 20Services Team. The training shall include how families and 21hospital staff can access BEACON, the process once a case is 22entered into BEACON, and State and community programs 23accessible through BEACON.